Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 420A.010 is amended to read:
420A.010. (1) The Oregon Youth Authority is established. The youth authority shall:
(a) Supervise the  management and administration of youth correction facilities, state parole and
probation  services,  community out-of-home placement for adjudicated youths committed to its legal
custody and other functions related to state programs for youth corrections;
(b) Provide capital improvements and capital construction  necessary for the implementation of
all youth correction facilities;
(c) Carry out dispositions of adjudicated youths committed to its legal custody;
(d) Exercise custody and supervision over those  adjudicated youths committed to the youth au-
thority by order of the juvenile court and persons placed in  the physical custody of the youth au-
thority under ORS 137.124 or other statute until the time  that a lawful release authority authorizes
release or terminates the commitment or placement;
(e) Provide adequate  food, clothing, health and medical care, sanitation and security for confined
adjudicated youths and others in youth authority custody;
(f) Provide adjudicated youths  and others in youth authority custody with opportunities for
self-improvement and work; and
(g) Conduct investigations and prepare reports for release authorities.
(2) To meet the individual circumstances of each person committed to  its custody, the youth
authority shall:
(a) Develop a [ flexible fee-for-service provider ] system of providers that can respond [ quickly] to
each person’s [ identified and changing ] individual circumstances; and
(b) Develop a process for joint  state and county review of contracts entered into under sub-
section (6)(b) of this section and paragraph (a) of this subsection based on:
(A) Measurable outcomes, which must include in  dominant part the reduction of future criminal
or antisocial conduct and which also must include:
(i) Academic progress;
(ii) Social adjustments;
(iii) Behavioral improvements;
(iv) Rearrests; and
(v) Other measurements as determined by the youth authority;
Enrolled Senate Bill 818 (SB 818-A) Page 1
(B) Performance measurements including:
(i) Fiscal accountability;
(ii) Compliance with state and federal regulations;
(iii) Record keeping, including data collection and management; and
(iv) Reporting; and
(C) Provision of services identified under the reformation plan.
(3) In order to measure performance as  required in subsection (2) of this section, the youth au-
thority shall require parties to the  contracts to compile, manage and exchange data to the extent
of available information systems resources to facilitate the measurement of outcomes including,  but
not limited to, reduction in future criminal or antisocial conduct.
(4) The youth authority may administer a program of state  assistance to counties for the con-
struction and operation of local youth detention facilities or to purchase detention services.
(5) The youth  authority shall accept and exercise legal or physical custody of adjudicated youths
and others 12  years of age and over and under 25 years of age who are committed to, or placed with,
the youth authority pursuant to:
(a) A juvenile court adjudication and disposition under ORS chapter 419C; or
(b) ORS 137.124.
(6)(a) The youth authority shall cooperate with  and assist county governments and juvenile de-
partments in carrying out the principles and purposes of  the juvenile justice system as provided in
ORS 419C.001.
(b) The youth authority is authorized to contract with counties, groups of counties or private
providers to administer  juvenile corrections programs and services as provided in ORS 420.017,
420.019, 420A.145 and 420A.155 (1) to (4).
(c) The youth authority may provide consultation  services related to the juvenile justice system
to local or statewide public or private agencies, groups and individuals  or may initiate such con-
sultation services. Consultation services include, but  are not limited to, conducting studies and
surveys, sponsoring or participating in educational programs and providing advice and  assistance.
Nothing in ORS 419C.001 and 420A.005 to 420A.155 is intended to diminish the state’s efforts to plan,
evaluate and deliver effective human services programs to adjudicated youths, either in a  youth
correction facility or on probation or parole. Therefore, the Oregon Youth Authority  and the De-
partment of Human Services shall jointly develop and implement needed social and  rehabilitative
services.
(7) The youth authority is  the recipient of all federal funds paid or to be paid to the state to
enable the state to  provide youth correction programs and services assigned to the Department of
Human Services prior to January 1, 1996.
(8) The youth authority shall report its progress in implementing the provisions of  chapter 422,
Oregon Laws 1995, to the Legislative Assembly at each odd-numbered year regular session.
(9) The equal access provisions of ORS 417.270  apply to the youth authority’s development and
administration of youth correction  facilities, programs and services, including the development and
implementation of the diversion plan described in ORS 420.017.
(10)(a) The youth authority shall:
(A) Be cognizant of and sensitive  to the issue of overrepresentation of minority adjudicated
youths in youth correction facilities;
(B) Endeavor to develop and operate, and require  its subcontractors to develop and operate,
culturally appropriate programs for adjudicated youths; and
(C)(i) Keep data reflecting the demographics, including race, ethnicity and gender, of  all adju-
dicated youths committed to its care;
(ii) Keep  data reflecting the demographics, including race, ethnicity and gender, of youth au-
thority employees;
(iii) Keep data as  necessary to monitor the measurable outcomes described in subsection
(2)(b)(A) of this section; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 818 (SB 818-A) Page 2
(iv) Regularly review and compare the measurable outcomes described in subsection  (2)(b)(A) of
this section with rates of recidivism, as  defined by the youth authority under ORS 420A.012, and
analyze the disparities in  outcomes based on the demographics of the persons in the youth
authority’s custody.
(b) In the development of the programs described in paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection, the
youth authority shall take into consideration the demographic  disparities among adjudicated youths
and between adjudicated youths and youth authority  employees and how those disparities may affect
the cultural appropriateness of the programs.
(11) [ The youth authority may make financial grants to local units of government, nonprofit  or-
ganizations and individuals from funds appropriated to the youth authority by the Legislative Assembly
to meet  the treatment and care needs of adjudicated youths committed to the custody of the youth au-
thority to  be able to respond quickly to each adjudicated youth’s identified and changing
circumstances] The youth authority may make financial grants from funds appropriated to the
youth authority to carry out the duties, functions  and powers vested in the youth
authority.
(12) The youth authority is a designated agency as defined in ORS 181A.010.
Passed by Senate March 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 21, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 818 (SB 818-A) Page 3